apertium-evn.evn.lexc
LEXICON PRON-PERS-POSSESSIVE

%<indposs%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:%>ӈи CLITICS ; !%{ː%}
%<indposs%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:%>ӈи%>%{i%}т CLITICS ; !%{ː%}
%<indposs%>%<sg%>:%>ӈи CASE-OBL ; !%{ː%}
%<indposs%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ӈи%>л CLITICS ; !%{ː%}
%<indposs%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>ӈи%>л%>%{i%}т CLITICS ; !%{ː%}
%<indposs%>%<pl%>:%>ӈи%>л CASE-OBL ; !%{ː%}

LEXICON PRON-PERS-POSSESSIVE-3-SG-CASE-OBL

%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{V%}%{A%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%}%>н CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{Б%}%{A%}%>н CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{Б%}%{Э%}%>н CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR ! Dir/LR
%<acc%>%<ind%>:%>%{ъ%}%{Я%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<acc%>%<ind%>:%>%{ъ%}%{Е%}%>н CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<datloc%>:%>%{D%}у%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<locall%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}л%{A%}%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<locall%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}л%{Э%}%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<all%>:%>т%{i%}ки%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<prl%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}ли%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<locdir%>:%>%{i%}кл%{A%}%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<locdir%>:%>%{i%}кл%{Э%}%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<allprl%>:%>%{i%}кли%{ː%}%>н CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}ук%>ин CLITICS ;
%<ela%>:%>%{G%}ид%>ин CLITICS ;
%<ins%>:ди%>н CLITICS ;
%<com%>:%>нун%>ин CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-POSSESSIVE-3-PL-CASE-OBL

%<acc%>%<def%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{V%}%{A%}%>тын CLITICS ;
%<acc%>%<def%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%}%>тын CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<acc%>%<def%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{Б%}%{A%}%>тын CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<acc%>%<def%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{Б%}%{Э%}%>тын CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR ! Dir/LR
%<acc%>%<ind%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{ъ%}%{Я%}%>тын CLITICS ;
%<acc%>%<ind%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{ъ%}%{Е%}%>тын CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<datloc%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{D%}у%{ː%}%>тын CLITICS ;
%<locall%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}л%{A%}%{ː%}%>тын CLITICS ;
%<locall%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}л%{Э%}%{ː%}%>тын CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<all%>%<px3pl%>:%>т%{i%}ки%{ː%}%>тын CLITICS ;
%<prl%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}ли%{ː%}%>тын CLITICS ;
%<locdir%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{i%}кл%{A%}%{ː%}%>тын CLITICS ;
%<locdir%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{i%}кл%{Э%}%{ː%}%>тын CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<allprl%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{i%}кли%{ː%}%>тын CLITICS ;
%<abl%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{D%}ук%>тын CLITICS ;
%<ela%>%<px3pl%>:%>%{G%}ид%>итын CLITICS ;
%<ins%>%<px3pl%>:ди%>тын CLITICS ;
%<com%>%<px3pl%>:%>нун%>тын CLITICS ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-CASES

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{A%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{Э%} POSS-SG-BIRA ; ! Dir/LR
!%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<def%>:%>эвэ POSS-SG-BIRA ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<all%>:%>тыки%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<locdir%>:%>икл%{A%}%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<locdir%>:%>икл%{Э%}%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<allprl%>:%>икли%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:%>гит POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:%>ит POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<com%>:%>нун POSS-SG-ORON ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>ил POSS-PL ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:%>ил%>ди POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>ил CASE-OBL-POSS ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<indposs%>:%>ӈи NOMINAL-INFL ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM

эр%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:эр POSS-SG-BIRA ;	
эр%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<datloc%>:э%>ду%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;	
эр%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<locall%>:э%>лэ%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;	
эр%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<prl%>:э%>ли%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;	
эр%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:э%>дук POSS-SG-BIRA ;
эр:эр PRON-DEM-CASES ;

тар%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:тар POSS-SG-BIRA ;
тар%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:тари POSS-SG-BIRA ; ! Dir/LR
тар%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<datloc%>:та%{ː%}%>ду%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;	
тар%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<locall%>:та%{ː%}%>ла%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;	
тар%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<prl%>:та%{ː%}%>ли%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;	
тар%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:та%{ː%}%>дук POSS-SG-BIRA ;
тар:тар PRON-DEM-CASES ;
тар:тари PRON-DEM-CASES ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON PRON-ITG

экун%<prn%>%<itg%>:эку%{а%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>%<indposs%>:эку%{а%}н%>ӈ%{i%} NOMINAL-INFL ;
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>:э%{а%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>%<indposs%>:э%{а%}%>ӈ%{i%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>:а NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>%<indposs%>:а%>ӈ%{i%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>:еку%{а%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ; ! Dir/LR
экун%<prn%>%<itg%>%<indposs%>:еку%{а%}н%>ӈ%{i%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR

ӈи%<prn%>%<itg%>:ӈи%{э%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! add ӈие as plural
ӈи%<prn%>%<itg%>%<indposs%>:ӈи%{э%}%>ӈ%{i%} NOMINAL-INFL ;

ир%<prn%>%<itg%>:ир%{э%} NOMINAL-INFL ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<acc%>%<def%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>ми # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<datloc%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>ду%{ː%}%>ви # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<all%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>тыки%{ː%}%>ви # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<locall%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>дулэ%{ː%}%>ви # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<prl%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>дули%{ː%}%>ви # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<locdir%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>иклэ%{ː%}%>ви # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<locdir%>:мэ%{ː%}%>клэ%{ː%}%>ви # ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<allprl%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>икли%{ː%}%>ви # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<allprl%>:мэ%{ː%}%>кли%{ː%}%>ви # ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>дук%>ви # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<ins%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>ди%>ви # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<ela%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>ӈит%>ви # ; ! this form is in Nedjalkov, but not in Boldyrev
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<com%>:мэ%{ː%}н%>нун%>ми # ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<acc%>%<def%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>вэр # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<datloc%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>ду%{ː%}%>вэр # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<all%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>тыки%{ː%}%>вэр # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<locall%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>дулэ%{ː%}%>вэр # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<prl%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>дули%{ː%}%>вэр # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<locdir%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>иклэ%{ː%}%>вэр # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<locdir%>:мэ%{ː%}%>клэ%{ː%}%>вэр # ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<allprl%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>икли%{ː%}%>вэр # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<allprl%>:мэ%{ː%}%>кли%{ː%}%>вэр # ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>дук%>вэр # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<ins%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>ди%>вэр # ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<ela%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>гит%>вэр # ; ! this form is in Nedjalkov, but not in Boldyrev
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<com%>:мэ%{ː%}р%>нун%>мэр # ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-PERS-CASES ! earlier POSS-SG-BIRA-PX

%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{V%}%{A%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{V%}%{Э%} POSS-SG-BIRA ; ! Dir/LR
%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{Б%}%{A%} POSS-SG-BIRA ; ! Dir/LR
%<acc%>%<def%>:%>%{Б%}%{Э%} POSS-SG-BIRA ; ! Dir/LR ! Dir/LR
%<datloc%>:%>%{D%}у%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<locall%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}л%{A%}%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<locall%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}л%{Э%}%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ; ! Dir/LR
%<all%>:%>т%{i%}ки%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<prl%>:%>%{D%}%{u%}ли%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<locdir%>:%>%{i%}кл%{A%}%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<locdir%>:%>%{i%}кл%{Э%}%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ; ! Dir/LR
%<allprl%>:%>%{i%}кли%{ː%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}ук POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<ela%>:%>%{G%}ит%{д%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<ins%>:%>%{i%}т%{д%} POSS-SG-BIRA ;
%<com%>:%>нун POSS-SG-ORON ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-PERS

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<px1sg%>:н%>ми CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<px1sg%>:м CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<px2sg%>:н%>ни CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>%<nom%>%<px3sg%>:н%>ин CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<sg%>:н PRON-REF-PERS-CASES ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<px1pe%>:%>р%>вун CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<px1pi%>:%>р%>ты CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<px2pl%>:%>р%>рун CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>%<nom%>%<px3pl%>:%>р%>тын CLITICS ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>:%>р PRON-REF-PERS-CASES ;

LEXICON A-INFL

NOMINAL-INFL ;
%<comp%>:%>%{D%}%{ы%}м%{A%}р NOMINAL-INFL ;
%<comp%>:%>%{D%}%{ы%}м%{Э%}р NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
%<sup%>:%>%{D%}%{ы%}%{G%}у NOMINAL-INFL ;

%<ints1%>:%>к%{A%}ку%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
%<ints1%>:%>к%{Э%}к%{Э%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<ints2%>:%>м%{A%}м%{A%} NOMINAL-INFL ;
%<ints2%>:%>м%{Э%}м%{Э%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
%<ints2%>:%>м%{Э%} NOMINAL-INFL ; ! Dir/LR

%<atten1%>:%>к%{A%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ;
%<atten1%>:%>к%{Э%}%{ː%} NOMINAL-INFL-N ; ! Dir/LR
%<atten2%>:%>ми NOMINAL-INFL-N ;

%<advz1%>:%>м%{A%}т ADV ;
%<advz1%>:%>м%{Э%}т ADV ; ! Dir/LR
%<advz2%>:%>т ADV ;

LEXICON A

A-INFL ;
%<pchu%>:%>пчу A-INFL ; ! form adjectives from qualitative adjectives

LEXICON ADJ

%<adj%>: A ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<indposs%>%<sg%>:нуӈан%>ӈи PRON-PERS-POSSESSIVE-3-SG-CASE-OBL ; !%{ː%}
нуӈан%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<indposs%>%<pl%>:нуӈан%>ӈи%>л PRON-PERS-POSSESSIVE-3-SG-CASE-OBL ; !%{ː%}
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<indposs%>%<sg%>:нуӈар%>ӈи PRON-PERS-POSSESSIVE-3-PL-CASE-OBL ;
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<indposs%>%<sg%>:нуӈан%>ӈи PRON-PERS-POSSESSIVE-3-PL-CASE-OBL ; ! Dir/LR !%{ː%}
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<indposs%>%<pl%>:нуӈар%>ӈи%>л PRON-PERS-POSSESSIVE-3-PL-CASE-OBL ; !%{ː%}
нуӈартын%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<indposs%>%<pl%>:нуӈан%>ӈи%>л PRON-PERS-POSSESSIVE-3-PL-CASE-OBL ; ! Dir/LR !%{ː%}
 LEXICON Adjectives 
авторскай:авторскай ADJ ; ! 
аив:аив ADJ ; ! 
ала̄нчэды:ала%{ː%}нчэды ADJ ; ! 
амаргу:амаргу ADJ ; ! "задний"
антенна:антенна ADJ ; ! 
аркӣдярӣ:арки%{ː%}дяри%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
ашиӈи:ашиӈи ADJ ; ! 
аятку:аятку ADJ ; ! 
балдыдя̄кты:балдыдя%{ː%}кты ADJ ; ! 
бдительнай:бдительнай ADJ ; ! 
бимэ:бимэ ADJ ; ! 
болонӣ:болони%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
бугдыпчу:бугдыпчу ADJ ; ! 
булэчӣ:булэчи%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
бучӣвча̄:бучи%{ː%}вча%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
бэюрды:бэюрды ADJ ; ! 
военнай:военнай ADJ ; ! 
газичӣ:газичи%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
героическай:героическай ADJ ; ! 
гнилые:гнилые ADJ ; ! гнилые
гочи:гочи ADJ ; ! 
гэды̄мэ:гэды%{ː%}мэ ADJ ; ! 
дагапты:дагапты ADJ ; ! 
дарулипчу:дарулипчу ADJ ; ! 
дёлосог:дёлосог ADJ ; ! 
дивэвкэ̄мэ:дивэвкэ%{ː%}мэ ADJ ; ! 
долгу:долгу ADJ ; ! 
дучама:дучама ADJ ; ! 
дылмарагда:дылмарагда ADJ ; ! 
дэтыпчу:дэтыпчу ADJ ; ! 
дю̄пты:дю%{ː%}пты ADJ ; ! 
дялда̄чэрӣ:дялда%{ː%}чэри%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
епӯ:епу%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
ивдяпчу:ивдяпчу ADJ ; ! 
илаксама:илаксама ADJ ; ! 
илу:илу ADJ ; ! 
инёмэчэе:инёмэчэе ADJ ; ! 
иӈнучӣ:иӈнучи%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
исламасса:исламасса ADJ ; ! 
каботажнэй:каботажнэй ADJ ; ! 
камнучӣ:камнучи%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
касичивча̄:касичивча%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
килэӈ:килэӈ ADJ ; ! 
клетчатай:клетчатай ADJ ; ! 
конторады:конторады ADJ ; ! 
крепкая:крепкая ADJ ; ! крепкая
кумӈа̄гдэ:кумӈа%{ː%}гдэ ADJ ; ! 
кэлкэмэ:кэлкэмэ ADJ ; ! 
кэтэмэмэ:кэтэмэмэ ADJ ; ! 
ларбима:ларбима ADJ ; ! 
лугдумэ:лугдумэ ADJ ; ! 
лэпимэ:лэпимэ ADJ ; ! 
маӈӣчавки:маӈи%{ː%}чавки ADJ ; ! 
механическай:механическай ADJ ; ! 
моӈнонды:моӈнонды ADJ ; ! 
муко:муко ADJ ; ! 
мунӈиктура:мунӈиктура ADJ ; ! 
мурумнэк:мурумнэк ADJ ; ! 
мэӈты:мэӈты ADJ ; ! 
на̄мнэдерӣ:на%{ː%}мнэдери%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
некэемэк:некэемэк ADJ ; ! 
не̄синчэ:не%{ː%}синчэ ADJ ; ! 
ниннука̄г:ниннука%{ː%}г ADJ ; ! 
нӯпчэ̄:ну%{ː%}пчэ%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
нэптэмэ:нэптэмэ ADJ ; ! 
нялбума:нялбума ADJ ; ! 
ӈе̄вӯ:ӈе%{ː%}ву%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
ӈуӈнэӈэ̄:ӈуӈнэӈэ%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
ӈэмтэлэ̄мэ:ӈэмтэлэ%{ː%}мэ ADJ ; ! 
оговчо̄:оговчо%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
олусма:олусма ADJ ; ! 
орденичӣ:орденичи%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
паровой:паровой ADJ ; ! 
подшефнай:подшефнай ADJ ; ! 
принципиальнай:принципиальнай ADJ ; ! 
пшеницама:пшеницама ADJ ; ! 
родной:родной ADJ ; ! 
сагдымама:сагдымама ADJ ; ! 
светлый:светлый ADJ ; ! светлый
сеявча̄:сеявча%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
симӯргава̄ндерӣ:симу%{ː%}ргава%{ː%}ндери%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
сливкачӣ:сливкачи%{ː%}%{☭%} ADJ ; ! from russian
сологу:сологу ADJ ; ! "верховской"
специальнэй:специальнэй ADJ ; ! 
сукунэлэчэ̄:сукунэлэчэ%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
сурки:сурки ADJ ; ! 
сэлу:сэлу ADJ ; ! 
та̄гивка̄мэ:та%{ː%}гивка%{ː%}мэ ADJ ; ! 
татыга̄вдерӣ:татыга%{ː%}вдери%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
тоӈиргача̄:тоӈиргача%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
туе:туе ADJ ; ! 
тургэнде:тургэнде ADJ ; ! 
тыкунӈӣвча̄:тыкунӈи%{ː%}вча%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
тынэвэпты:тынэвэпты ADJ ; ! 
тысэвчэ:тысэвчэ ADJ ; ! 
тэ̄нды:тэ%{ː%}нды ADJ ; ! 
углипчу:углипчу ADJ ; ! 
укчак:укчак ADJ ; ! 
умгумэ:умгумэ ADJ ; ! 
уӈиктачи:уӈиктачи ADJ ; ! 
уркӯвча̄:урку%{ː%}вча%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
усэ̄чӣ:усэ%{ː%}чи%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
фабричнай:фабричнай ADJ ; ! 
хаварӣпчу:хавари%{ː%}пчу ADJ ; ! 
ха̄рпуга̄пчу:ха%{ː%}рпуга%{ː%}пчу ADJ ; ! 
хима̄мэ:хима%{ː%}мэ ADJ ; ! 
хуламасса:хуламасса ADJ ; ! 
хэгдыӈэ:хэгдыӈэ ADJ ; ! 
һагды:һагды ADJ ; ! старый
чампулима:чампулима ADJ ; ! 
чопкокӣ:чопкоки%{ː%} ADJ ; ! 
шёлкомо:шёлкомо ADJ ; ! 
экӣтмэр:эки%{ː%}тмэр ADJ ; ! 
эмигэ:эмигэ ADJ ; ! 
энюм:энюм ADJ ; ! 
ю̄дек:ю%{ː%}дек ADJ ; ! 
